Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 20 Mail Ballots
17-20-11.
Safekeeping of lists of applicants.

The copies of certified applications and the certified lists returned to the several local boards shall be safely kept in the custody of the boards until the first day of September in the second (2nd) year after the boards have received the lists.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2.

17-20-12.
Secretary of state to furnish forms and supplies.

All mail ballots, application forms, certified envelopes for enclosing ballots, any other envelopes that may be necessary, and instructions as to voting, use of ballots, and affidavits, shall be furnished and supplied by the secretary of state for use in mailing application forms, ballots, and other supplies to mail voters to carry out the provisions of this chapter, but each local board shall print or stamp upon the application form and upon the return envelope the address of the local board. The secretary of state is authorized to interpret and apply the provisions of this chapter in a manner that effects the legislative intention set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2.

17-20-13.
Form of application.

The application to be subscribed by the voters before receiving a mail ballot shall, in addition to those directions that may be printed, stamped, or written on it by authority of the secretary of state, be in substantially the following form:

STATE OF RHODE ISLANDAPPLICATION OF VOTER FOR BALLOT FOR ELECTIONON (COMPLETE HIGHLIGHTED SECTIONS) NOTE — THIS APPLICATION MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE BOARD OF CANVASSERS OF YOUR CITY OR TOWN NOT LATER THAN 4:00 P.M ON BOX A (PRINT OR TYPE) NAME VOTING ADDRESS CITY/TOWN STATE ZIP CODE RI DATE OF BIRTH PHONE # BOX B (PRINT OR TYPE) NAME OF INSTITUTION (IF APPLICABLE) ADDRESS ADDRESS CITY/TOWN STATE ZIP CODE FACSIMILE NUMBER (if applicable) I CERTIFY THAT I AM ELIGIBLE FOR A MAIL BALLOT ON THE FOLLOWING BASIS: (CHECK ONE ONLY) ( ) 1. I am incapacitated to such an extent that it would be an undue hardship to vote at the polls because of illness, mental or physical disability, blindness, or a serious impairment of mobility. If the ballot is not being mailed to your voter registration address (BOX A above) please provide the Rhode Island address where you are temporarily residing in BOX B above. ( ) 2. I am confined in a hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, rest home, or similar institution within the State of Rhode Island. Provide the name and address of the facility where you are residing in BOX B above. ( ) 3. I am employed or in service intimately connected with military operations or because I am a spouse or dependent of such person, or I am a United States citizen and will be outside the United States. Complete BOX B above or the ballot will be mailed to the local board of canvassers. ( ) 4. I choose to vote by mail. If the ballot is not being mailed to your voter registration address (BOX A above) please provide the address within the United States where you are temporarily residing in BOX B above. If you request that your ballot be sent to your local board of canvassers please indicate so in BOX B above. BOX D OATH OF VOTER I declare that all of the information I have provided on this form is true and correct to the best of my knowledge. I further state that I am not a qualified voter of any other city or town or state and have not claimed and do not intend to claim the right to vote in any other city or town or state. If unable to sign name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, applicant shall make his or her mark “X”. SIGNATURE IN FULL Please note: A Power of Attorney signature is not valid in Rhode Island.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 13; P.L. 1985, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 498, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 41; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 41; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 119, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 167, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-13.1.
Form of emergency mail ballot application.

The emergency mail ballot application to be subscribed by the voters before receiving a mail ballot shall, in addition to any directions that may be printed, stamped, or written on the application by authority of the secretary of state, be in substantially the following form:

STATE OF RHODE ISLANDEMERGENCY APPLICATION OF VOTER FORBALLOT FOR ELECTION ON (COMPLETE HIGHLIGHTED SECTIONS) NOTE — THIS APPLICATION MUST BE RECEIVED BY THEBOARD OF CANVASSERS OF YOUR CITY OR TOWN NOT LATER THAN 4:00 P.M. ON BOX A (PRINT OR TYPE) NAME VOTING ADDRESS CITY/TOWN STATE ZIP CODE RI DATE OF BIRTH PHONE# BOX B (PRINT OR TYPE) NAME OF INSTITUTION (IF APPLICABLE) ADDRESS ADDRESS CITY/TOWN STATE ZIP CODE I CERTIFY THAT I AM ELIGIBLE FOR A MAIL BALLOT ON THE FOLLOWING BASIS: (CHECK ONE ONLY) ( ) 1. I am incapacitated to such an extent that it would be an undue hardship to vote at the polls because of illness, mental or physical disability, blindness or a serious impairment of mobility. If not voting ballot at local board, ballot will be mailed to the address in BOX A above or to the Rhode Island address provided in BOX B above. If the ballot is to be delivered by the local board of canvassers to a person presenting written authorization to pick up the ballot, complete BOX A above and fill in the person’s name below. I hereby authorize to pick up my ballot at my local board of canvassers. ( ) 2. I am confined in a hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, rest home, or similar institution within the State of Rhode Island. Provide the name and address of the facility where you are residing in BOX B above. ( ) 3. I am employed or in service intimately connected with military operations or because I am a spouse or dependent of such person, or I am a United States citizen who will be outside the United States. If not voting ballot at local board, provide address in BOX B above. ( ) 4. I choose to vote by mail. If the ballot is not being mailed to your voter registration address (BOX A above) please provide the address within the United States where you are temporarily residing in BOX B above. If you request that your ballot be sent to your local board of canvassers please indicate so in BOX B above. I hereby authorize to pick up my ballot at my local board of canvassers. BOX D OATH OF VOTER I declare that all of the information I have provided on this form is true and correct to the best of my knowledge. I further state that I am not a qualified voter of any other city or town or state and have not claimed and do not intend to claim the right to vote in any other city or town or state. If unable to sign name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, applicant shall make his or her mark “X”. SIGNATURE IN FULL Please note: A Power of Attorney signature is not valid in Rhode Island.

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-14.
Voting from hospitals, convalescent homes, nursing homes, rest homes or similar institutions, public or private, within the State of Rhode Island — Penalty for interference.

The state board of elections shall appoint as many bipartisan pairs of supervisors as are necessary whose duty it shall be to attend each hospital, rest home, nursing home and convalescent home, or similar types of personal care facility in the state within twenty (20) days prior to the election. They shall supervise the casting of votes by persons using mail ballots at a place that preserves their secrecy and shall take acknowledgments, and jointly provide assistance, if requested, to assure proper marking, sealing, and mailing of ballots as voted. It shall be the duty of the person or persons in charge of hospitals, rest homes, nursing homes and convalescent homes, or similar types of personal care facility to allow the state supervisors to perform their duties as set forth in this section at all reasonable times. Every person who willfully hinders the state supervisors in performing their duties as set forth in this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

It shall be the responsibility of the state board of elections to provide all bipartisan pairs of supervisors with an official identification card. All bipartisan pairs of supervisors will be required to have in their possession their identification card when conducting official business.

Any person who deliberately misrepresents themselves as an official of the board of elections, or who deceives, coerces, or interferes with a voter casting a ballot, shall be subject to prosecution under §

17-20-30

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 500, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-14.1.
Mail ballots — Local supervision.

Each local board shall be authorized to appoint one or more bipartisan pairs of supervisors in the manner that other bipartisan pairs of supervisors are appointed for each election, whose duty it shall be to attend each person who makes an application for a mail ballot under §§

17-20-2.1

and

17-20-2.2

, who does not fall under the provisions of §

17-20-14

, and who requests that a bipartisan pair of supervisors be sent by the board of canvassers to that person’s place of residence for the purpose of supervising or assisting the mail voter in casting his or her vote. The bipartisan pairs of supervisors shall supervise the casting of votes by persons using the mail ballot at a place that preserves their secrecy and shall take acknowledgments, and jointly provide assistance, if requested, to assure proper marking, sealing, and mailing of ballots as voted. The failure or neglect of any local board to appoint these bipartisan pairs, or the failure or neglect of any pair to attend any place at which a mail voter’s ballot may be used, or the marking, sealing, or mailing of ballots in the absence of any pair, shall not invalidate any ballot.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-14.2.
Voting from board of canvassers.

The local board of canvassers shall appoint as many supervisors as are necessary whose duty it shall be to supervise the casting of votes by persons using mail ballots at a place that preserves their secrecy and to take acknowledgments, and jointly provide assistance, if requested, to assure proper marking, sealing, and mailing of ballots as voted. Every certifying envelope containing a mail ballot cast at a board of canvassers must have the signature of the elector. The certifying envelope of any mail ballot voted at the local board of canvassers shall be stamped by the local board to indicate it was voted on in conformance with the law. Every person who willfully hinders the local supervisors in performing their duties as set forth in this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 14; P.L. 1984, ch. 391, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-15.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 3; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 3, effective January 1, 2002.

17-20-16.
Time of casting vote.

Mail ballots may be cast in the manner provided by law on or before election day; provided, that no mail ballot shall be counted unless it is received by the state board not later than the time prescribed by §

17-18-11

for the closing of polling places on election day, except ballots cast under the provisions of §

17-20-6.1

, which shall be counted if received by the state board by four o’clock p.m. (4:00) on the third day following a primary or four o’clock p.m. (4:00) on the seventh day following an election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 201, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 268, § 2.

17-20-17.
Omission of presidential electors.

Every mail ballot previously required by the provisions of law to contain the names of electors for president and vice-president of the United States shall contain the names of all candidates for president and vice-president of the United States preceded by the words “Electors for” in lieu of names of the electors for the officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2.

17-20-18.
Instructions on ballot.

The secretary of state may, if the secretary deems necessary, cause to be printed at the head of the ballot brief instructions for voting and the use of the ballot. The mail ballots shall, in addition to the official endorsement provided by law, bear the words: “Mail voters”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 13.

17-20-19.
Envelopes for return of ballots.

Envelopes for the enclosure and return of mail ballots and their enclosing certified envelope shall have the printed or written address: “Board of Elections, 2000 Plainfield Pike, Cranston, Rhode Island 02921” or a post office box established and maintained by the board; and shall be forwarded by the secretary of state to each mail voter whose application for the mail ballot has been received and accepted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 7, § 3; P.L. 2020, ch. 8, § 3.

17-20-20.
Instructions for voting procedure.

The secretary of state shall also cause to be prepared and printed an adequate number of copies of instructions for voting procedure in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or the secretary may cause the instructions to be printed in an appropriate place on the official mail ballots.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2.

17-20-21.
Certifying envelopes.

The secretary of state shall cause to be prepared and printed and shall furnish with each mail ballot an envelope for sealing up and certifying the ballot when returned. The envelope shall be printed in substantially the following form:

“After marking ballot or ballots, fold and enclose in this envelope and seal it. Certify to statement hereon. Enclose in envelope addressed to board of elections, which must receive the envelope not later than the time prescribed by §

17-18-11

for the closing of polling places on the day of election.” Date of Election: City/Town of: Certificate of Voter Print Name of Voter I swear or affirm, under penalty of perjury, that I am: • I am a United States citizen; • I am a resident and qualified voter of the State of Rhode Island; • I am eligible to cast a mail ballot under the provisions of §

17-20-2

; and • I have not and will not vote elsewhere in this election. I hereby attest under the pains and penalty of perjury, that the enclosed voted ballot was cast by me, and that the signature or mark on this certifying envelope was made by me. Voter must sign full name here: (If unable to sign name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, voter shall make his or her mark “(X)”).

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 41; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 41; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-22.
Certification envelopes for mail ballots of persons intimately connected with military service and persons employed outside of the United States.

The distinctively colored certification envelope for persons intimately connected with military service and persons employed outside of the United States shall be printed in substantially the following form:

After marking ballot or ballots, fold and enclose in this envelope and seal it. Certify to statement hereon. Enclose in envelope addressed to board of elections, which must receive the envelope not later than the time prescribed by for the closing of polling places on the day of election. §

17-18-11

Date of Election City/Town of Oath of Elector Casting the Enclosed Ballot or Ballots Print Name I do hereby affirm, under penalty of perjury that: • I am a United States citizen; • I am a resident and qualified voter of the State of Rhode Island; • I am eligible to cast a mail ballot, because I am one of the following: • A member of the Uniformed Services or merchant marine on active duty or an eligible spouse or dependent. • A U.S. citizen who will be outside the United States. • I am not qualified to vote elsewhere. (Signature of voter)

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 15; P.L. 1984, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 66, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 74, § 1.

17-20-22.1.
Mail ballot drop boxes.

“Drop box” means the locked and secure container established and maintained by the board of elections, in accordance with this section, that shall serve as a receptacle for the receipt of mail and emergency ballots cast by voters. Every drop box established by the board of elections shall be deemed to be the property of the board of elections and shall be accessible to the public, beginning twenty (20) days prior to the date of a state election and twenty-four (24) hours per day and seven (7) days per week throughout this period, if established outside a municipal building, and during the normal business hours of the facility if established inside a municipal building. All drop boxes must be accessible on election day, from the time polls open until the time they close, in accordance with §§

17-18-10

and

17-18-11

. Any ballot that is cast by a voter, as either a mail ballot or emergency ballot, and is deposited into a drop box on or before the close of polls on election day, shall be deemed to be received by and in the possession of the board of elections. At the close of polls on election day, upon the last ballot deposited by any person in line at that time, a designated agent of the board of elections shall ensure that no other ballots are deposited in the drop box.

Drop boxes must be labeled “State of Rhode Island Official Ballot Drop Box for Mail Ballots,” and include language about postage and display the official seal of the board of elections. Drop boxes must be accessible by persons with disabilities. Drop boxes shall be monitored by a video surveillance system.

No town or city shall have fewer than one drop box. A drop box may be established inside a municipal building, only if the building remains open and accessible to the public throughout the prescribed time period prior to election day and until the close of the polls, in accordance with §

17-18-10

. A drop box shall also be placed outside the office of the board of elections and the election division of the office of the secretary of state. Drop boxes must be placed in locations that are accessible to persons with disabilities.

Each local board of canvassers shall determine the location of every drop box located within the geographic area over which that local board has authority, in accordance with the regulations promulgated by the board of elections.

Each drop box shall not accept the deposit of mail ballots after the last person in line to deposit a ballot in that drop box at the time the polls close, on the day of the election, has deposited their ballot.

Each local board shall make the location of every drop box within the area over which it has authority publicly available on its website, to the extent feasible. The board of elections shall make the location of all drop boxes located within the state publicly available at its office and on its website.

The board of elections shall designate one or more staff members of each local board of canvassers as the official agents of the board of elections, for purposes of retrieving ballots deposited in drop boxes and establish a schedule and process by which drop boxes are regularly emptied and any ballots they contain are securely and promptly transported to the board of elections.

The board of elections shall promulgate regulations consistent with this section, including regulations for the location of drop boxes and the receipt, storage, security, regular collection, and transportation of the mail ballots returned.

The board of elections may promulgate regulations for the use of drop boxes for depositing mail ballot applications during the applicable timeframe for accepting mail ballot applications.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 6, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 6, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-23.
Marking and certification of ballot.

A voter may vote for the candidates of the voter’s choice by making a mark in the space provided opposite their respective names.

In case a voter desires to vote upon a question submitted to the vote of the electors of the state, the voter shall mark in the appropriate space associated with the answer that the voter desires to give.

The voter shall enclose and seal the ballot in the envelope provided for it. The voter shall then enclose and seal the certified envelope with the ballot in the envelope addressed to the state board and cause the envelope to be delivered to the state board on or before election day.

These ballots shall be counted only if received within the time limited by this chapter.

There shall be a space provided on the general election ballot to allow the voter to write in the names of persons not in nomination by any party as provided for in §§

17-19-31

and 17-20- 24.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 13; P.L. 2001, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 279, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 280, § 4; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-24.
Irregularities not impairing validity of ballots.

No ballot transmitted under the provisions of this chapter shall be rejected for any immaterial addition, omission, or irregularity in the preparation or execution of the computer ballot, nor for failure of the voter to affix sufficient postage. No ballot shall be invalid by reason of mistake or omission in writing in the name of any candidate where the candidate intended by the voter is plainly identifiable. Where, because of any defect in marking, a ballot is held invalid as to any particular candidate for office, it shall remain valid as to the candidates for other offices. No ballot shall be invalid by reason of the voter writing upon the inner envelope the name of a community within a town in place of the name of the town. No defect in the marking of the appropriate space associated with casting a vote shall invalidate any ballot or a vote for any candidate, where the intention of the voter is clearly indicated.

No ballot shall be rejected if the intention of the voter is clear unless it contains clear evidence of the identity of the voter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 15; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 13.

17-20-24.1.
Irregularities in obtaining and casting mail ballots.

The requirements set forth by this chapter controlling mail ballot eligibility and the procedure by which mail ballots are obtained and cast shall be strictly applied to assure the integrity of the electoral system. No mail ballot which was not obtained and/or cast in material conformance with the provisions of this title shall be certified by the board of elections. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the disqualification of a ballot merely because the elector did not sign the elector’s full name as it is listed on the voter registration list, but omitted or included a middle initial or name, abbreviated a first and/or middle name, or made a similar omission or inclusion, as long as the board of elections can reasonably determine the identity of the voter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 16; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-25.
Return of unused ballots.

Every voter who has received a mail ballot and has not cast it shall nevertheless return the unvoted ballot and its uncertified enclosing envelope to the state board or local board with a statement that the voter is not using the mail ballot, before eight o’clock (8:00) p.m. on election day.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 58, § 1.

17-20-26.
Opening and counting of ballots.

Beginning prior to and continuing on election day the state board, upon receipt of mail ballots, shall keep the ballots in a safe and secure place that shall be separate and apart from the general public area and sufficiently monitored through security measures including security cameras. The board shall, beginning twenty (20) days prior to and continuing on election day, proceed to certify the mail ballots.

Notice of these sessions shall be given to the public on the state board of elections’ website and the secretary of state’s website posted at least twenty-four (24) hours before the commencing of any session. All candidates for state and federal office, as well as all state party chairpersons, shall be given notice by telephone, email or otherwise of the day on which ballots will be certified; provided, that failure to effect the notice shall in no way invalidate the ballots.

This processing shall be done within a railed space in the room in which it takes place, and the board shall admit within the railed space, in accordance with those rules that the board shall adopt, to witness the processing and certification of the ballots, the interested voter or the voter’s representative, the candidates, or at least one representative of each candidate for whom votes are at the time being processed, and an equal number of representatives of each political party. These representatives shall be authorized in writing by the voter, the candidate, or the chairperson of the state committee of the political party, respectively, as the case may be. The board shall also, in accordance with these rules, admit representatives of the press and newscasting agencies and any other persons that it deems proper.

At these sessions, and before certifying any ballot, the state board shall:

Determine the city or town in which the voter cast his or her ballot; and

Compare the name, residence, and signature of the voter with the name, residence, and signature on the central voter registration system for mail ballots and satisfy itself that both signatures are identical. The board shall designate two (2) persons, to review and compare each voter’s signature with the voter’s signature found in the central voter registration system. If both designees agree that the signatures match, the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that one or both designees find a discrepancy with the voter’s signature, the certification envelope shall then be reviewed by a pair of supervising board staff members. If the pair of supervising board staff members find that the signatures match, then the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that one or both supervising board staff members find a discrepancy in the voter’s signature, the supervising board staff shall compare the signature on the certification envelope to the voter’s ballot application. If the pair of supervising board staff members find that those signatures match, then the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that one or both supervising board staff members find a discrepancy in the voter’s signature, the supervising board staff shall compare the signature on the certification envelope to the voter’s ballot application. If the pair of supervising board staff members find that the signatures match, then the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that one or both supervising board staff members find a discrepancy in the voter’s signature, the certification envelope shall be segregated, and the board will notify the voter of the discrepancy, in accordance with regulations and procedures promulgated by the board. Any segregated certification envelope that has not been cured or fully addressed by the voter, in accordance with the board’s promulgated regulations and procedures, shall be reviewed by the board to make a final determination on the signature set forth on the certification envelope.

[Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 259, § 1.]

The board shall promulgate regulations that allow for challenges to the certification process by the interested voter, the voter’s representative, the candidates, and representatives of the recognized political parties. Such challenges shall be made to the executive director of the board, or the executive director’s designee. The decision of the executive director or designee shall be subject to review by the board.

After processing and certification of the mail ballots, they shall be separated in packages in accordance with their respective cities and towns, in the presence of all interested parties. Thereupon, in each instance the board staff shall open the enclosing envelope, and without looking at the votes cast on the enclosed ballot, shall remove the ballot from the envelope. The board staff shall proceed to tabulate the ballots through the use of a central count optical-scan unit with the same effect as if the ballots had been cast by the electors in open town or district meetings.

When a local election is held at a time other than in conjunction with a statewide election, the state board, after the processing and certification of the mail ballots cast in the local election, shall package the local ballots to be promptly delivered in sealed packages, bearing upon the seals the signatures of the members of the board, to the appropriate local board which shall thereupon proceed to count the ballots in the same manner and with the same effect as state mail ballots are counted by the state board.

When a local election is held in New Shoreham at a time other than in conjunction with a statewide election, the state board, after the processing and certification of the mail ballots cast in the local election, shall have the authority to count the ballots in the same manner and with the same effect as state mail ballots are counted by the state board in a statewide election. Once the ballots are counted, the results shall be sent via facsimile to the local board in New Shoreham.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 13; P.L. 2005, ch. 119, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 167, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 57, § 1, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 58, § 1, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-27.
Sealing of ballots and voting list.

The state board shall, at the completion of the count of all votes cast at any election, securely store all ballots cast in the election, and after the certification of the results of the elections, the state board shall place all ballots received from mail voters together with the certified envelopes containing the ballots in a steel box or package and shall seal the ballots and envelopes in open meetings of the board by affixing at least four (4) adhesive labels, and the members of the board shall sign the labels by affixing their signatures in ink to each of the labels, and thereafter no steel box or package shall upon any pretense be reopened by any person, except upon order of the general assembly or a court of competent jurisdiction, but shall be held by the board for twenty-two (22) months, when they may then be destroyed. The certified copies of the voting lists of mail voters and the applications referred to in §

17-20-10

shall likewise be safely sealed and kept by the board for the same length of time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 13; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 13; P.L. 2015, ch. 78, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 84, § 1.

17-20-28.
Copies of chapter furnished to local boards.

On or before the fifteenth (15th) day of September in any year in which a general state or congressional district election is held, the secretary of state shall send to the local boards an attested copy of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2.

17-20-29.
Mail applicant not permitted to vote at polls.

No person, or one claiming to be that person, whose name has been marked upon any voting list, provided for official use at any election, with the mark as provided by §

17-20-10

, shall be permitted to vote in person at the election; provided, that the person may re-establish his or her right to vote in person by presenting himself or herself at that person’s local board on or before election day and surrendering his or her mail ballot. Upon that surrender the person’s name shall be restored to the voting list. Any person whose name has been marked on the voting list may also be permitted to vote in person if that person executes and delivers to the local board an affidavit stating that the person did not receive the mail ballot, or that the mail ballot was lost or destroyed.

Each local board shall, immediately after the close of the polls, certify and deliver to the state board the names and addresses of all persons restored to the voting list, together with the affidavits and surrendered ballots received pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2.

17-20-30.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who knowingly makes or causes to be made any material false statement in connection with his or her application to vote as a mail voter, or who votes or attempts to vote under the provisions of this chapter, by fraudulently signing the name of another upon any envelope provided for in this chapter, or who, not being a qualified voter and having knowledge or being chargeable with knowledge of the fact, attempts to vote under this chapter, or who votes the ballot of another voter, or who deliberately prevents or causes to prevent the mail ballot to be received by the voter or to be returned to the board of elections, or who deceives, coerces, or interferes with the voter casting his or her ballot, and any person who does or attempts to do, or aid in doing or attempting to do, a fraudulent act in connection with any vote cast or to be cast under the provisions of this chapter, shall be guilty of a felony.

Any person who, having received a mail voter’s ballot and having voted or not voted the mail ballot, votes or fraudulently attempts to vote at any elective meeting within the state held on the day for which the ballot was issued shall be guilty of a felony.

Any officer or other person who intentionally opens a mail voter’s certified envelope or examines the contents before the envelope is opened by the board of elections, as provided in this chapter, shall be guilty of a felony.

The offenses in this section shall be punishable by imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years and/or by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 5, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 5, effective June 7, 2022.

17-20-31.
Investigation of complaints.

The board of elections shall consider all complaints that it receives alleging criminal violations of this chapter and shall refer those complaints which it receives which it deems to be more than frivolous to the state police for investigation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 19.

17-20-32.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 19; P.L. 1991, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 207, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 45, § 7, effective June 7, 2022; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 46, § 7, effective June 7, 2022.

Compiler’s Note.

Former §

17-20-32

concerned inquiry by the board of elections into a notary public or witness.

17-20-33.
Disqualification of ballot by board of elections.

The board of elections shall, on its own motion, disqualify any mail ballot which it determines, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, was not voted by the elector who purportedly cast it, or was voted by an elector who was not eligible to vote by mail ballot, or was not obtained and voted in the manner prescribed by this chapter. The board of elections may take this action even in the absence of a challenge to the ballot and may take this action at any time prior to the separation of the ballot from its application and certifying envelope.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 19.

17-20-34.
Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be construed liberally to effect the purposes of maintaining the integrity and the secrecy of the mail ballot by assuring that only electors eligible to vote by mail ballot are allowed to utilize that method of voting, by assuring that the procedures set forth in this chapter controlling the application and balloting processes are strictly enforced, and by safeguarding the mail ballot voter from harassment, intimidation, and invasion of privacy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 19.

17-20-35.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application of the provision to any persons or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected by the invalidity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 19.